Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.220

Abuse of adolescents—Staff training curriculum.

(1) Within existing resources, the department shall develop a curriculum designed to train department staff who assess or provide services to adolescents on how to screen and respond to referrals to child protective services when those referrals may involve victims of abuse or neglect between the ages of eleven and eighteen. At a minimum, the curriculum developed pursuant to this section shall include:

(a) Review of relevant laws and regulations, including the requirement that the department investigate complaints if a parent's or caretaker's actions result in serious physical or emotional harm or present an imminent risk of serious harm to any person under eighteen;

(b) Review of departmental policies that require assessment and screening of abuse and neglect referrals on the basis of risk and not age;

(c) Explanation of safety assessment and risk assessment models;

(d) Case studies of situations in which the department has received reports of alleged abuse or neglect of older children and adolescents;

(e) Discussion of best practices in screening and responding to referrals involving older children and adolescents; and

(f) Discussion of how abuse and neglect referrals related to adolescents are investigated and when law enforcement must be notified.

(2) As it develops its curriculum pursuant to this section, the department shall request that the office of the family and children's ombuds review and comment on its proposed training materials. The department shall consider the comments and recommendations of the office of the family and children's ombuds as it develops the curriculum required by this section.

(3) The department shall complete the curriculum materials required by this section no later than December 31, 2005.

(4) Within existing resources, the department shall incorporate training on the curriculum developed pursuant to this section into existing training for child protective services workers who screen intake calls, department staff responsible for assessing or providing services to older children and adolescents, and all new employees of the department responsible for assessing or providing services to older children and adolescents.

[ 2018 c 58 s 46; 2013 c 23 s 44; 2005 c 345 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.